Washington statutes.
RCW 14.08.330

Jurisdiction of municipality over airport and facilities exclusive—Concurrent jurisdiction over adjacent territory—Fire code enforcement by agreement.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 2061-S.SL) ***

Every airport and other air navigation facility controlled and operated by any municipality, or jointly controlled and operated pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, shall, subject to federal and state laws, rules, and regulations, be under the exclusive jurisdiction and control of the municipality or municipalities controlling and operating it. The municipality or municipalities shall have concurrent jurisdiction over the adjacent territory described in *RCW 14.08.120(2). No other municipality in which the airport or air navigation facility is located shall have any police jurisdiction of the same or any authority to charge or exact any license fees or occupation taxes for the operations. However, by agreement with the municipality operating and controlling the airport or air navigation facility, a municipality in which an airport or air navigation facility is located may be responsible for the administration and enforcement of the uniform fire code, as adopted by that municipality under RCW 19.27.040, on that portion of any airport or air navigation facility located within its jurisdictional boundaries.

[ 1985 c 246 s 1; 1945 c 182 s 15; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 2722-44.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 14.08.120 was amended by 2020 c 96 s 1, changing subsection (2) to subsection (1)(b).